Wyoming, session 2026, HB0044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-1-138(c), 1-1-140(d), 1-23-107(a),
6-8-104(aa), 7-6-103(k), 7-13-402(g), 7-13-1401(h),
7-13-1501(j), 7-13-1502(j), 7-18-106(c), 9-1-404, 9-1-406,
9-1-407(a) and (b), 9-2-3204(b)(xii) and (xiii),
11-20-201(b), 13-12-104(a)(intro), 14-12-104, 15-1-125(c),
15-4-304, 15-4-308, 17-32-126(b)(i)(C), 18-2-111,
18-3-510(a), 18-3-513(b), 35-2-1108 and 37-12-306(e) are
amended to read:
1-1-138. Donation of emergency responder equipment;
exemption from civil and criminal liability; definitions;
relation to other law.
(c) Should any grant of immunity, exception or
imposition of liability within the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act, W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120, conflict with
any provision of this section, the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act shall prevail.
1-1-140. Public utility exemption from civil
liability; catastrophes caused by an act of God.
(d) Should any grant of immunity, exception or
imposition of liability within the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act, W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120, conflict with
any provision of this section, the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act shall prevail.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
1-23-107. Individual liability of members of
governmental agencies.
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
any provision of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the
members of any governmental board, agency, council,
commission or governing body are not individually liable
for any actions, inactions or omissions by the governmental
board, agency, council, commission or governing body.
6-8-104. Wearing or carrying concealed weapons;
penalties; exceptions; permits.
(aa) Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S. 1-39-105
through 1-39-112, the attorney general and members of the
division of criminal investigation are immune from personal
liability for issuing, for failing to issue and for
revoking any concealed firearms permit under this section.
A sheriff, police chief, employee of a sheriff or police
chief's office shall not be personally liable for damages
in a civil action arising from any information submitted
pursuant to subsections (g) through (j) of this section.
Nothing in this section shall relieve any governmental
entity of any liability pursuant to W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120 the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act.
7-6-103. Creation of office of state public defender;
appointment of state public defender and assistants;
duties; removal.
(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, any attorney providing services for the office of
the state public defender in the defense of a criminal case
shall, for matters arising out of such services, be
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
considered a state employee for purposes of coverage and
representation under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act,
W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120, and the state
self-insurance program, W.S. 1-41-101 through 1-41-111.
7-13-402. General powers and duties of board;
eligibility for parole; immunity.
(g) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-119
the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the board and its
members are immune from any liability, either as a board or
individually, for any actions, inactions or omissions by
the board or any member thereof, pursuant to W.S. 7-13-401
through 7-13-424.
7-13-1401. Petition for expungement; records of
arrest, dismissal of charges, disposition; eligibility; no
filing fee.
(h) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
any provision of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the
division of criminal investigation and its employees are
immune from liability, either as an agency or individually,
for any actions, inactions or omissions by the agency or
any employee thereof, pursuant to this section.
7-13-1501. Petition for expungement of records of
conviction of certain misdemeanors; filing fee; notice;
objections; hearing; definitions; exceptions.
(j) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
any provision of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the
division of criminal investigation and its employees and
any prosecuting attorney are immune from liability, either
as an agency or individually, for any actions, inactions or
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
omissions by the agency or any employee thereof, pursuant
to this section.
7-13-1502. Petition for expungement of records of
conviction of certain felonies; filing fee; notice;
objections; hearing; definitions; restoration of rights.
(j) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
any provision within the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act,
the division of criminal investigation and its employees
and any prosecuting attorney are immune from liability,
either as an agency or individually, for any actions,
inactions or omissions by the agency or any employee
thereof, pursuant to this section.
7-18-106. Powers and duties of boards.
(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
any provision within the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act,
or any other provision of law and except for intentional
torts or illegal acts, a corrections board and its members
are immune from any liability, either as a board or
individually, for any actions or omissions by the board or
any member thereof pursuant to this act.
9-1-404. Specified claims against state to be
presented within one year.
Except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, persons having claims
against the state shall document the claim and submit it to
the state auditor within one (1) year after the claim
accrues, to be audited, settled and acted upon.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
9-1-406. Taking evidence concerning settlement of
accounts.
Except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the state auditor may
examine the parties, witnesses or others, on oath or
affirmation, relating to any matters material to the
settlement of accounts, including information which is
declared confidential by law, and for that purpose may
issue subpoenas and compel witnesses to attend before him
and give evidence in the same manner and by the same means
allowed by law to courts of record. The state auditor shall
take all reasonable measures necessary to protect the
confidentiality of all confidential information obtained
pursuant to this section.
9-1-407. Certificate of auditor's decision; claims
against state in absence of appropriation or authorization.
(a) At the request of a person who is dissatisfied
with the decision of the auditor on any claim, account or
credit except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the auditor shall
certify his findings and decision.
(b) Except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120 the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, when the law
recognizes a claim for money against this state and no
appropriation or authorization is made by law to pay the
claim, upon demand, the auditor shall audit and adjust the
claim and give the claimant a certificate of the amount of
the claim.
9-2-3204. General services division.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) For the purpose of this subsection the term
"agencies" does not include the University of Wyoming,
community college districts, or school districts. It does
not include the department of transportation except as to
paragraphs (xi), (xii) and (xiii) of this subsection. The
department through the general services division shall:
(xii) Secure and maintain insurance against the
risks of fire and theft and other insurance deemed
necessary or required by law on all motor vehicles, trailer
attachments and aircraft owned by the state of Wyoming or
any of its agencies. The insurance secured and maintained
shall be in an amount which is adequate to protect the
interest of the state but not less than the amounts
required by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act. In securing insurance the
department shall take full advantage of experience ratings
and groupings or master policies to the end that the
insurance may be secured at the lowest possible beneficial
rates and for the best interest of the state;
(xiii) Secure personal liability and surety
bonds for Wyoming peace officers, employees and state
officials as required by statute, secure professional
liability insurance for Wyoming doctors and nurses employed
by the state, and secure liability insurance for all
property owned by the state or any of its agencies as
required by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act;
11-20-201. Designation of contract services to
implement brand inspection laws; bond required; bond of
inspectors; interstate cooperative agreements.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) The agency, or the board may contract for
inspectors as the board deems necessary to carry out
specified duties. The board may contract for inspectors
through an individual at-will contract. The board may
contract to provide the inspector salary, mileage, per diem
and other necessary reimbursable expenses, membership in
the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan in
accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV) and 9-3-207,
and the state retirement system in accordance with W.S.
9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV), 9-3-412 and 9-3-413.1. The board
shall be authorized to establish mileage rates without
regard to the limitations provided in W.S. 9-3-103. During
the time that inspectors are acting within the scope of
their duties on behalf or in service of the state in their
official capacity, inspectors are covered by the provisions
of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S. 1-39-101
through 1-39-120, and the state self-insurance program,
W.S. 1-41-101 through 1-41-111. It may assign inspectors
inside or outside of this state as it deems appropriate. A
blanket bond or individual bonds shall be executed to the
state with good and sufficient surety in an amount
determined by the board, conditioned for the full and
faithful performance and discharge of the inspector's
duties. The bond shall be approved by and filed in the
office of the board.
13-12-104. Requirements relating to depositors;
nature of business.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (d) of
this section, No depositor shall maintain an account with a
special purpose depository institution or otherwise receive
any services from the institution unless the depositor
meets the criteria of this subsection. A depositor shall:
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
14-12-104. Applicability of the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act and state self-insurance program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
any attorney providing services for the office pursuant to
the guardian ad litem program shall, for matters arising
out of such services, be considered a state employee for
purposes of coverage and representation under the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act, W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120,
and the state self-insurance program, W.S. 1-41-101 through
1-41-111.
15-1-125. Presentation and payment of claims; when
warrant draws interest; exception.
(c) This section does not apply to claims under W.S.
1-39-101 through 1-39-119 [§ 1-39-120] the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act.
15-4-304. Claims; appeals; exception; definition.
Except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, if any claim against the
city is disallowed in whole or in part, the claimant may
appeal from the decision of the governing body to the
district court of the district in which the city or town is
situated pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of
Appellate Procedure. "Claim" as used in this section means
claims as are presented for audit and not claims for
salaries of officers and employees or other fixed charges
against the city or town, nor claims covered by W.S.
1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the Wyoming Governmental Claims
Act.
15-4-308. Conditions causing injury; defects.
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
No action may be maintained against the city or town on
account of injuries received by means of any defect in the
condition of any bridge, street, sidewalk or thoroughfare
except as provided by W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-119 the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act.
17-32-126. Winding up; termination.
(b) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association, the members:
(i) Shall discharge the nonprofit association's
debts, obligations and other liabilities, settle and close
the nonprofit association's business and distribute any
remaining property:
(C) If neither subdivision subparagraph (A)
or (B) of this paragraph applies, in accordance with the
law of unclaimed property contained in W.S. 34-24-101
through 34-24-140.
18-2-111. Judgment against county to be paid by tax
levy; when execution to issue.
Except as provided in W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, when a judgment is
rendered against the board of county commissioners or any
county officer the judgment shall be paid by a tax levied
for that purpose and when collected shall be paid by the
county treasurer to the judgment creditor upon the delivery
of a proper voucher. Execution may issue on the judgment if
payment is not made within sixty (60) days after the time
required for the payment of county taxes to the county
treasurer.
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
18-3-510. Claims against county to be itemized and
verified; penalty.
(a) No claim against the county shall be allowed by
the board of county commissioners unless it is properly
dated and itemized and the value of each item specifically
described, and when no specified fees are allowed by law,
the date that such services were rendered and the time
actually and necessarily devoted to the performance of any
service. Each claim shall be accompanied by an affidavit,
stating that the claim is just and correct and that no part
of the claim has been paid by the county or other person.
The board of county commissioners may disallow any account,
in whole or in part, when so rendered and verified, and may
require further evidence of the truth and propriety of the
claim. This section does not apply to claims under W.S.
1-39-101 through 1-39-120 the Wyoming Governmental Claims
Act.
18-3-513. Appeal on disallowance of claim.
(b) When the appeal is perfected, the clerk of the
board shall immediately give notice to the county attorney.
The clerk shall make a brief return of the proceedings
before the board with the decision properly certified and
file the same together with the bond and all papers in the
case in his possession with the clerk of the district
court. The appeal shall be entered, tried and determined
and costs awarded the same as appeals from circuit courts.
This section does not apply to claims under W.S. 1-39-101
through 1-39-120 the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act.
35-2-1108. Receiver's liability.
10

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) The liability of the department shall be limited
as set forth in the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.
1-39-101 through 1-39-120, for the operation of medical
facilities and the provision of health care.
(b) If a person is designated to act as a receiver
pursuant to W.S. 35-2-1103(f) and is not covered by the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120, the designated receiver shall only be held liable
in a personal capacity for the designated receiver's own
gross negligence, intentional acts or breach of fiduciary
duty.
37-12-306. Civil penalties; applicability.
(e) This section shall not apply to any governmental
entity as defined by W.S. 1-39-103(a)(i), which
participates in the notification center as provided by this
act. Nothing in this article shall affect any provision of
the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act., W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120.
Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix) is amended to read:
1-39-103. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-123 1-39-124.
Section 3. W.S. 39-16-105(a)(xi), as created by 2026
Senate Enrolled Act 0059, 2026 Senate File 0061, section 1,
is repealed.
11

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. Section 2 of this act shall not be
effective if 2026 Senate File 0101 is enacted into law.
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
12